Utah statutes.
53A-11-1404.   Graduation requirements -- Military children.
(1) (a)  A district or charter school administrative official shall:
(i)  waive specific courses required for a military child to graduate if the
military child has satisfactorily completed similar course work in another
local education agency; or
(ii)  provide reasonable justification for denial.
(b)  If a waiver described in Subsection (1) is denied and a military child
would have qualified to graduate from the military child's previous local
education agency, the district or charter school shall provide alternative
means of acquiring required coursework so that the military child may graduate
on time.
(2)  Notwithstanding Section 53A-1-611 and except as provided in Subsection
(3), a district or charter school shall accept the following in place of
testing requirements for graduation of military children:
(a)  exit or end-of-course exams required for graduation from a military
child's previous local education agency;
(b)  national norm-referenced achievement tests; or
(c)  alternative testing.
(3)  If a military child transfers during the military child's junior or
senior year and a district or charter school cannot accommodate the provisions
of Subsection (1) or (2), the district or charter school and the military
child's previous local education agency shall ensure the receipt of a diploma
from the previous local education agency, if the military child meets the
graduation requirements of the previous local education agency.
